Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2071.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; city of Apache Junction The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute to the city of Apache Junction for the following purposes: 1. $5,000,000 for support of a rural small business and workforce hub. 2. $6,000,000 for support of rural infrastructure revitalization. 3. $4,500,000 for development of a rural health and community services facility.